Maine, session 132, LD852.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 34-A MRSA §1208-B, sub-§4, as amended by PL 2023, c. 135, §3, is
further amended to read:
4. Requirements; rulemaking by commissioner. The jails shall operate in
accordance with best practices applicable to facilities of their type and size, including the
mandatory standards, policies and procedures established by rules adopted by the
commissioner under subsection 1 and standards adopted under section 1208, and with the
following requirements as set forth in rules adopted by the commissioner. In adopting rules
and standards for the jails, the commissioner shall consider incorporate the advisory input
of the County Corrections Professional Standards Council established pursuant to Title 5,
section 12004‑G, subsection 6‑D.
A. Each jail shall participate in coordination of inmate transportation. Coordination
of transportation may be provided by the jail at which the inmate resides, by another
jail or correctional facility or by a person or entity working under a contract with the
jail at which the inmate resides.
B. Each jail shall provide access to substance use disorder screening, assessment,
medication, treatment, recovery and reentry services, including at a minimum:
(1) Screening on intake using evidence-based tools to assess the risk of overdose
or withdrawal and the person's history of substance use disorder and to determine
initial treatment options;
(2) Medically managed withdrawal treatment consistent with evidence-based
medical standards;
(3) All forms of medication for addiction treatment, including at least one of each
formulation of each United States Food and Drug Administration-approved
medication-assisted treatments for substance use disorder, including alcohol use
disorder and opioid use disorder, to ensure that each person receives the particular
formulation found to be the most effective at treating and meeting the person's
individual needs. Medication under this subparagraph must be offered for the
duration of the person's incarceration;
(4) Behavioral treatment options, such as group and individual counseling, and
clinical support;
(5) Peer support services;
(6) Reentry planning and transitional support such as coordination with
community-based treatment and case management service providers and recovery
organizations to ensure reentry and continuity of care after release, including
appointments for services made prior to release; and
(7) Assistance in obtaining health insurance prior to release.
Substance use disorder services required by this paragraph may be provided at the jail
at which the person resides or at another jail or correctional facility or by a service
provider or entity working under a contract with the jail at which the person resides.
C. Each jail shall provide mental health treatment, including at a minimum providing
a licensed clinician or licensed professional organization that will be available to assist
Page 1 - 132LR0999(01)

413 an inmate who is a person receiving mental health treatment. Mental health treatment
424 required by this paragraph may be provided at the jail at which the person resides or at
435 another jail or correctional facility or by a service provider or entity working under a
446 contract with the jail at which the person resides.
D. Each jail shall provide community programs and services as required by this
subchapter, including at a minimum pretrial or conditional release, alternative
sentencing or housing programs and electronic monitoring.
E. Each jail shall provide initial and ongoing training and technical assistance for
facility staff and health care practitioners on screening, assessment, medication and
treatment protocols for substance use disorder.
Sec. 2. 34-A MRSA §1210-E, sub-§2, as enacted by PL 2021, c. 732, Pt. A, §3
and affected by §5, is amended to read:
2. County Jail Operations Fund. The County Jail Operations Fund is established to
provide funding for county jails and the regional jail. State Prior to July 1, 2025, state
funding must be appropriated annually for the fund in the amount of $20,342,104 plus any
additional amount the Legislature may appropriate. Beginning July 1, 2025 and prior to
July 1, 2026, state funding must be appropriated annually for the fund in the amount of
$25,445,838 plus any additional amount the Legislature may appropriate. Beginning July
1, 2026, state funding must be appropriated annually for the fund in an amount equal to
20% of the total General Fund appropriation to the department for the costs of all
correctional facilities under the department plus any additional amount the Legislature may
appropriate. The department shall administer the fund and shall distribute funds to the jails
in accordance with this section for the purposes set forth in subsections 3 and 4 and in
accordance with the distribution formula set forth in subsection 9.
Sec. 3. 34-A MRSA §1210-E, sub-§2-A is enacted to read:
2-A. Additional state appropriation to support standards compliance.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, in addition to the state funding
requirements under subsection 2, beginning July 1, 2026, state funding must be
appropriated annually for the fund in an amount equal to 90% of the costs incurred by
county jails and the regional jail in the prior fiscal year in complying with the mandatory
standards established by the commissioner pursuant to section 1208-B. Funding
appropriated to the fund under this subsection must be administered and distributed in the
same manner as the funding appropriated to the fund under subsection 9.
Sec. 4. 34-A MRSA §1210-E, sub-§5, as enacted by PL 2021, c. 732, Pt. A, §3
and affected by §5, is amended to read:
5. Quarterly payments to counties. The department shall distribute funding payable
to the counties for operation of the jails quarterly if the jails have reported on a timely basis
as required by subsection 6 and rules adopted pursuant to subsection 7. Failure to report
as required may result in delayed payment of funds required to be paid by this section.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, if a jail fails to report as required by
the end of a fiscal year, the department shall distribute the quarterly funding payment for
that jail between all other jails that are in compliance with the reporting requirement of
subsection 6 for that quarter using the formula under subsection 9 or a different formula as
established by the council.
Page 2 - 132LR0999(01)

Sec. 5. 34-A MRSA §1210-F, sub-§3, as enacted by PL 2021, c. 732, Pt. A, §4, is
amended to read:
3. First meeting; chair; administrative services costs. When all appointments have
been made pursuant to subsection 1, the commissioner shall call the first meeting of the
council. By a majority vote, the council shall select a chair from the members appointed
under subsection 1, paragraphs A and B to serve a 2-year term. Administrative services
costs associated with the activities of the council must be paid by the department.